Mississippi statutes. Title 79. Corporations, Associations, and Partnerships
Subarticle B. Amendment of Bylaws.

§79-4-10.20.
Amendment by board of directors or shareholders.

A corporation’s shareholders may amend or repeal the corporation’s bylaws.

A corporation’s board of directors may amend or repeal the corporation’s bylaws unless:

The articles of incorporation or Section 79-4-10.21 reserve that power exclusively to the shareholders in whole or part; or

The shareholders in amending, repealing, or adopting a bylaw expressly provide that the board of directors may not amend, repeal, or reinstate that bylaw.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 486, § 10.20; Laws, 2000, ch. 469, § 12, eff from and after July 1, 2000.

The 2000 amendment rewrote the section.

Amendment of bylaws under Mississippi Nonprofit Corporation Act, see §§ 79-11-313 through 79-11-317.

18A Am. Jur. 2d, Corporations §§ 263, 266, 272-275.

6A Am. Jur. Legal Forms 2d, Corporations §§ 74:797, 74:798, 74:976, 74:1190-74:1192.

7A Am. Jur. Pl & Pr Forms (Rev), Corporations, Form 153.

18 C.J.S., Corporations § 252.

§79-4-10.21.
Bylaw increasing quorum or voting requirement for directors.

A bylaw that increases a quorum or voting requirement for the board of directors may be amended or repealed:

If adopted by the shareholders, only by the shareholders, unless the bylaw otherwise provides;

If adopted by the board of directors, either by the shareholders or by the board of directors.

A bylaw adopted or amended by the shareholders that increases a quorum or voting requirement for the board of directors may provide that it can be amended or repealed only by a specified vote of either the shareholders or the board of directors.

Action by the board of directors under subsection (a) to amend or repeal a bylaw that changes the quorum or voting requirement for the board of directors must meet the same quorum requirement and be adopted by the same vote required to take action under the quorum and voting requirement then in effect or proposed to be adopted, whichever is greater.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 486, § 10.21; Laws, 2000, ch. 469, § 13, eff from and after July 1, 2000.

The 2000 amendment rewrote the section.

Amendment of bylaws under Mississippi Nonprofit Corporation Act, see §§ 79-11-313 through 79-11-317.

Validity, construction, and effect of provision in charter or bylaw requiring supermajority vote. 80 A.L.R.4th 667.

18A Am. Jur. 2d, Corporations § 832.

18 C.J.S., Corporations §§ 642, 643.

§79-4-10.22.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 2000, ch. 469, eff from and after July 1, 2000.

[Laws, 1987, ch. 486, § 10.22, eff from and after January 1, 1988]

Former § 79-4-10.22 provided for bylaws increasing quorum or voting requirements for directors.
For present provisions, see § 79-4-10.21.

Amendment of bylaws under Mississippi Nonprofit Corporation Act, see §§ 79-11-313 through 79-11-317.